Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Masc_Retroflex12.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounMascRetroflex11Stem;

LEXICON NounMascRetroflex11Stem   

අගමැතිතුම
අගවිනිසුරුතුම
අග්‍රවිනිශ්චයකාරතුම
අදිකාරම්තුම
අධ්‍යක්ෂතුම
අධ්‍යක්‍ෂතුම
ආචාර්යතුම
ආණ්ඩුකාරතුම
ආදිපාදතුම
ඇදුරුතුම
ඇමතිතුම
උතුම
එතුම
කථානායකතුම
ගුරුතුම
ජනරාල්තුම
ජනාධිපතිතුම
තුම
නායකතුම
පඬිතුම
පියතුම
පූජකතුම
මන්ත්‍රීතුම
මැතිතුම
මුදලිතුම
රජතුම
විද්‍යාලයාධිතුම
විනිශ්චයකාරතුම
විපක්ෂනායකතුම
විපක්‍ෂනායකතුම
හමුදාපතිතුම



LEXICON NounMascRetroflex11

ා+N+RT:ා  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:ා  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC:ා  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:ාත්  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:ාත්  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:ායි  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:ායි  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:ෙක් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:ෙකි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+CJ:ෙකුත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:ෙකු #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:කු #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:ෙකි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:ෙකුත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:කුයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:කුත් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ACC:න්  #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:නුත්  #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:නි  #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:ාට #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:ාටත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:ාටයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:ෙකුට #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:ෙකුටත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:ෙකුටයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:කුට #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:කුටත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:කුටයි #;
ා+N+RT+PL+DAT:න්ට #;
ා+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:න්ටත් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:න්ටයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:ාගෙන් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:ාගෙනුත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:ාගෙනි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:ෙකුගෙන් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:ෙකුගෙනුත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:ෙකුගෙනි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:කුගෙන් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:කුගෙනුත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:කුගෙනි #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ABL:න්ගෙන් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:න්ගෙනුත් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:න්ගෙනි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ාගේ #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ාගේත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ාගේයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ගෙ #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ගෙත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ගෙයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:ෙකුගේ #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:ෙකුගේත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:ෙකුගේයි #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:කුගේ #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:කුගේත් #;
ා+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:කුගේයි #;
ා+N+RT+PL+GEN:න්ගේ #;
ා+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:න්ගේත් #;
ා+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:න්ගේයි #;
ා+N+RT+PL+VOC:නි #
ා+N+RT+SG+VOC:ෝ #
